Washington statutes.
RCW 36.23.100

Electronic payment of court fees and other financial obligations—Authorized.

County clerks are authorized to accept credit cards, charge cards, debit cards, smart cards, stored value cards, federal wire, and automatic clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic communication, for payment of all fees and moneys due the court under RCW 36.18.012 through 36.18.020, and for the payment of court-ordered legal financial obligations of criminal defendants which include, but are not limited to, fines, fees, assessments, restitution, and crime victims' compensation, consistent with RCW 36.48.010, 36.48.080, and 36.48.090. A payer desiring to pay by credit card, charge card, debit card, smart card, stored value card, federal wire, and automatic clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic communication shall bear the cost of processing the transaction.

[ 2000 c 202 s 1.]